Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 9
DEPOSITIONS

Sec.

§ 9-901. Depositions within or without state. [Repealed.]

§ 9-902 — 9-904. Depositions — Notice — Service. [Repealed.]

§ 9-905, 9-906. Depositions — Order — Taking without order. [Repealed.]

§ 9-907. When witnesses need not attend. [Repealed.]

§ 9-908. When depositions shall not be read. [Repealed.]

§ 9-909, 9-910. Powers of officer taking deposition — Application. [Repealed.]

§ 9-911 — 9-914. Swearing and examination of witnesses — Writing, reading and signing deposition — Certificate of officer — Deposition to clerk. [Repealed.]

§ 9-915 — 9-919. Deposition offered in evidence — Commission to take — Authentication — Filing — Publication. [Repealed.]

§ 9-920, 9-921. Objections to competency, questions, validity and admissibility. [Repealed.]

§ 9-922, 9-923. Use of depositions in subsequent actions — Irregularities not fatal. [Repealed.]

§ 9-924. Failure to take deposition

Judgment for expenses. [Repealed.]

§ 9-925. Depositions upon written interrogatories. [Repealed.]

§ 9-926 — 9-929. Depositions to be used out of state — Commission issued or not issued — Subpoena of witnesses — Certifying and transmitting depositions. [Repealed.]